lexc/noun/enhuoaee.lexc
!!!enhuoa.-> enhuoaee .lexc!!!
!!! EetoePP does é->e here
!!! UutouPP3 does ú->u here, etc...
!!! Some of the words here are also in enhuoaeejaje, and get
!! also plural poss jaje like útjaim
!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter

§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
§VV§ §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez11§ §oeoez42§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez42§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNount
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posst;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Posst
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounSup
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     CaseSup;

LEXICON CaseSup
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n

!

LEXICON Noun
Kislég AddNoun;
Kissár AddNount;
Szentmihályúr AddNount;
ablakháttér AddNoun;
acélmozsár AddNount;
adóháttér AddNoun;
adónév:adónev AddNounSup;
afgánagár AddNount;
ajándékpohár AddNount;
alagút AddNoun;
albumnév:albumnev AddNounSup;
alkamadár AddNount;
alprogramnév:alprogramnev AddNounSup;
alumíniumkötél AddNount;
alvázközép AddNoun;
anyanév:anyanev AddNounSup;
aprólevél AddNount;
apácanév AddNoun;
apátnév:apátnev AddNounSup;
asztalháttér AddNoun;
asztalnév:asztalnev AddNounSup;
asztalos-mesterlevél AddNount;
autómárkanév:autómárkanev AddNounSup;
bagószén AddNount;
balettrúd AddNoun;
bandanév:bandanev AddNounSup;
banánfalevél AddNount;
becenév:becenev AddNounSup;
bekezdésnév AddNoun;
beléndeklevél AddNount;
betegnév:betegnev AddNounSup;
betűtípusnév AddNoun;
betűtípusnév:betűtípusnev AddNounSup;
bikakötél AddNount;
blokknév:blokknev AddNounSup;
bodzabél AddNount;
bojtorjángyökér AddNoun;
boltnév:boltnev AddNounSup;
borospohár AddNount;
botkéz AddNoun;
bronznyél AddNount;
bádognyúl AddNount;
bányamész AddNoun;
békatutajhínár AddNount;
béketanév:béketanev AddNounSup;
bóknév AddNoun;
bútorfanév:bútorfanev AddNounSup;
búzalevél AddNount;
bőrfedél AddNoun;
cikknév:cikknev AddNounSup;
csalilégy AddNoun;
csatolmánynév:csatolmánynev AddNounSup;
csatornasugár AddNount;
cselekményszíntér AddNoun;
csillagképnév:csillagképnev AddNounSup;
csillekerék AddNoun;
csodanyúl AddNount;
csoportnév:csoportnev AddNounSup;
csoportszíntér AddNoun;
csótánybogár AddNount;
csőkút AddNoun;
cégnév:cégnev AddNounSup;
célpontnév:célpontnev AddNounSup;
darabközép AddNoun;
darukötél AddNount;
dinnyenév:dinnyenev AddNounSup;
diszknév:diszknev AddNounSup;
diákgúnynév AddNoun;
diáknév:diáknev AddNounSup;
dombnév:dombnev AddNounSup;
drogút AddNoun;
dárdanyél AddNount;
díjnév:díjnev AddNounSup;
dísznév AddNoun;
egykristályrúd AddNoun;
egységnév:egységnev AddNounSup;
elcsendesülőfél AddNount;
elég AddNoun;
előkötél AddNount;
előételnév:előételnev AddNounSup;
energiatér AddNoun;
eseménynév:eseménynev AddNounSup;
eukaliptuszlevél AddNount;
exportegér AddNoun;
fajtanév:fajtanev AddNounSup;
fakószekér AddNoun;
fantáziafonál AddNount;
faút AddNoun;
fegyvernév:fegyvernev AddNounSup;
feladatnév AddNoun;
felhívólevél AddNount;
feltételnév:feltételnev AddNounSup;
felvonórúd AddNoun;
feszítőkötél AddNount;
filmhét AddNoun;
foglalkozásnév:foglalkozásnev AddNounSup;
folyamvíz AddNoun;
forgatókosár AddNount;
formációnév:formációnev AddNounSup;
forráskút AddNoun;
fáraónév:fáraónev AddNounSup;
fékezőkötél AddNount;
fékpedálút AddNoun;
fényháttér AddNoun;
férjnév:férjnev AddNounSup;
fölbomlófél AddNount;
földművelésháttér AddNoun;
fürkésződarázs AddNoun;
füstsugár AddNount;
főnév:főnev AddNounSup;
főütőér AddNoun;
gabonabogár AddNount;
gazdálkodástér AddNoun;
gimnáziumnév:gimnáziumnev AddNounSup;
gondolavasút AddNoun;
gratulálólevél AddNount;
gyerekszemész AddNoun;
gyurmakötél AddNount;
gyászlégy AddNoun;
gyógyszernév:gyógyszernev AddNounSup;
gyümölcsvíz AddNoun;
gázlómadár AddNount;
gödörtér AddNoun;
hadvezérnév:hadvezérnev AddNounSup;
hajhínár AddNount;
hajszálgyökér AddNoun;
hallótér AddNoun;
hangköznév:hangköznev AddNounSup;
hangszórókosár AddNount;
hangzónév AddNoun;
határvíz AddNoun;
helyiségnév:helyiségnev AddNounSup;
hidraulikatér AddNoun;
hitelesítőlevél AddNount;
hivatkozásnév:hivatkozásnev AddNounSup;
honfiész AddNoun;
hullámszél AddNount;
hálózatvíz AddNoun;
háznév:háznev AddNounSup;
háztél AddNount;
hírnév AddNoun;
hősnév:hősnev AddNounSup;
hővíz AddNoun;
hűtősugár AddNount;
individuumnév AddNoun;
internetnév:internetnev AddNounSup;
ismertetőlevél AddNount;
istállónév:istállónev AddNounSup;
jelenettér AddNoun;
jelöltnév:jelöltnev AddNounSup;
játékbogár AddNount;
jósnév:jósnev AddNounSup;
jövevénynév AddNoun;
kanyarsugár AddNount;
kapcsolatnév:kapcsolatnev AddNounSup;
karbidmész AddNoun;
kategórianév:kategórianev AddNounSup;
kegylevél AddNount;
kendertér AddNoun;
keretoklevél AddNount;
kiadónév:kiadónev AddNounSup;
kiképzőtér AddNoun;
kimenőlevél AddNount;
kiégőfél AddNount;
klubnév:klubnev AddNounSup;
kokszparázs AddNoun;
konstansnév:konstansnev AddNounSup;
korallmadár AddNount;
korpavíz AddNoun;
kulcsmadár AddNount;
kunhalomnév:kunhalomnev AddNounSup;
kákagyökér AddNoun;
kávéháznév:kávéháznev AddNounSup;
készülőfél AddNount;
kígyónév:kígyónev AddNounSup;
kólavíz AddNoun;
könyvtárnév:könyvtárnev AddNounSup;
körzőbél AddNount;
közép AddNoun;
kütyünév:kütyünev AddNounSup;
lantmadár AddNount;
lebegőlégy AddNoun;
lemeznév:lemeznev AddNounSup;
leszállófél AddNount;
lornyonnyél AddNount;
lovasszekér AddNoun;
lánykeresztnév:lánykeresztnev AddNounSup;
légzőgyökér AddNoun;
létrasugár AddNount;
madárnév:madárnev AddNounSup;
makrónév AddNoun;
mangrovemocsár AddNount;
megkopófél AddNount;
megyenév:megyenev AddNounSup;
mentőrúd AddNoun;
mesterségnév:mesterségnev AddNounSup;
metrószél AddNount;
modulnév:modulnev AddNounSup;
mostohakéz AddNoun;
mukibogár AddNount;
munkacsoportnév:munkacsoportnev AddNounSup;
márványfedél AddNoun;
médiahátszél AddNount;
médianév:médianev AddNounSup;
műemlékkörút AddNoun;
műnyúl AddNount;
műnév:műnev AddNounSup;
nemzetségnév:nemzetségnev AddNounSup;
neutronsugár AddNount;
nitrogénjég AddNoun;
nyúlbél AddNount;
nádfödél AddNoun;
név:nev AddNounSup;
oldalellenszél AddNount;
oromfedél AddNoun;
országnév:országnev AddNounSup;
ostorkötél AddNount;
panziónév:panziónev AddNounSup;
papiroslevél AddNount;
papírfedél AddNoun;
partíciónév:partíciónev AddNounSup;
patkánytehén AddNount;
pincefenék AddNoun;
pisztrángkosár AddNount;
polgárnév:polgárnev AddNounSup;
portáskéz AddNoun;
pozitronsugár AddNount;
processzornév:processzornev AddNounSup;
pusztanév:pusztanev AddNounSup;
pálmabél AddNount;
pályaút AddNoun;
példánynév:példánynev AddNounSup;
pöfögőbogár AddNount;
reaktortér AddNoun;
regiszternév:regiszternev AddNounSup;
reklámpohár AddNount;
rendszámnév:rendszámnev AddNounSup;
robbanólég AddNoun;
romlófél AddNount;
rájanév:rájanev AddNounSup;
rázókosár AddNount;
rózsagyökér AddNoun;
sajtókosár AddNount;
sajátnév:sajátnev AddNounSup;
serdülőfél AddNount;
silófedél AddNoun;
statisztamadár AddNount;
stílusnév:stílusnev AddNounSup;
szakítólevél AddNount;
szalmafedél AddNoun;
szekrényfél AddNount;
személynév:személynev AddNounSup;
szemétalagút AddNoun;
szeretetsugár AddNount;
szigetnév:szigetnev AddNounSup;
szivarnév AddNoun;
szolgamadár AddNount;
szolgáltatásnév:szolgáltatásnev AddNounSup;
számlálónév:számlálónev AddNounSup;
szárcsagyökér AddNoun;
szélszarvkötél AddNount;
színnév:színnev AddNounSup;
szólókerék AddNoun;
szőrkötél AddNount;
szűrőnév:szűrőnev AddNounSup;
sétányút AddNoun;
süldőnyúl AddNount;
tanulmányút AddNoun;
tanárnév:tanárnev AddNounSup;
tartályfél AddNount;
településiszennyvíz AddNoun;
tengerészkötél AddNount;
tenyészetnév:tenyészetnev AddNounSup;
textilréz AddNoun;
tisztségnév:tisztségnev AddNounSup;
tizedfél AddNount;
tucatbenzinkút AddNoun;
tudósnév:tudósnev AddNounSup;
turbósugár AddNount;
táltosnév:táltosnev AddNounSup;
társzekér AddNoun;
tésztakosár AddNount;
tésztanév:tésztanev AddNounSup;
tömködőrúd AddNoun;
törtszámnév:törtszámnev AddNounSup;
tüdőfél AddNount;
tűzkerék AddNoun;
ultrasugár AddNount;
uniónév:uniónev AddNounSup;
vakondvasút AddNoun;
vallólevél AddNount;
varázslónév:varázslónev AddNounSup;
vesefél AddNount;
vetítőtér AddNoun;
vevőnév:vevőnev AddNounSup;
világmadár AddNount;
vizespohár AddNount;
vonatnév AddNoun;
vonatnév:vonatnev AddNounSup;
várnév:várnev AddNounSup;
városúr AddNount;
vásárút AddNoun;
vésznév:vésznev AddNounSup;
vízúr AddNount;
zenészkéz AddNoun;
zónanév:zónanev AddNounSup;
zúzónyél AddNount;
államnév AddNoun;
állomásnév:állomásnev AddNounSup;
ásónyél AddNount;
édesköménygyökér AddNoun;
építménynév:építménynev AddNounSup;
értesítőlevél AddNount;
ívközép AddNoun;
ómennév:ómennev AddNounSup;
öntősugár AddNount;
ötletér AddNoun;
üdítőpohár AddNount;
ügyfélnév:ügyfélnev AddNounSup;
őstér AddNoun;
